New York, session 2025-2026, A7587.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 5 of section 1 of chapter 1016 of 2 the laws of 1969, constituting the New York city health and hospitals 3 corporation act, is amended to read as follows: 4 6. To acquire, by purchase, gift, devise, lease or sublease, and to 5 accept jurisdiction over and to hold and own, and dispose of by sale, 6 lease or sublease, real or personal property, including but not limited 7 to a health facility, or any interest therein for its corporate 8 purposes; provided, however, that no health facility or other real prop- 9 erty acquired or constructed by the corporation shall be sold, leased or 10 otherwise transferred by the corporation without public hearing by the 11 corporation after twenty days public notice and without [the consent of 12 the board of estimate of the city] adherence to applicable provisions of 13 law, including compliance with the city's uniform land use review proce- 14 dure to the extent required pursuant to section 197-c of the New York 15 city charter; 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 17 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11141-04-6